Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-207
Lease; discharge by endorsement on indenture; procedure.

Any oil and gas or mining lease that has been or may hereafter be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of any county may be discharged and canceled by an endorsement made on the original lease signed by the lessee or his duly authorized attorney in fact, assignee of record or personal representative or, if a corporation, by its duly authorized officers, surrendering his or its right, title and interest in and to such lease, which endorsement may be entered on the margin of the record thereof, and shall have the same force and effect as the entry on the margin of the record as provided in section 57-206.

Laws 1925, c. 133, § 4, p. 351;

C.S.1929, § 57-204;

R.S.1943, § 57-207.